Maine, session 132, LD1020.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §1965, sub-§1, ¶D-2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 68, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA §1965-C, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 68, §3, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 23 MRSA §1968, sub-§2-D, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 68, §4, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Return property purchased for connector to Gorham. The Maine
Turnpike Authority shall sell any property acquired for the construction of a connector in
Cumberland County from Route 114 in South Gorham to an interchange on the turnpike to
the prior property owner, or the prior property owner's heirs, assigns or successors, at the
same amount for which the authority purchased the land. If the Maine Turnpike Authority
is not able to sell the land to the prior property owner or the prior property owner's heirs,
assigns or successors within a year of enactment of this Act, the Maine Turnpike Authority
shall transfer the land for no consideration to the municipality in which it is located.
If the municipality decides it does not want the property, the municipality shall donate
the property to a local land trust for no consideration. If the local land trust does not wish
to accept the land, the municipality may offer the land for sale at a public auction.